Utah statutes.
26-2-16.   Certificate of death -- Duties of a custodial funeral service
director, an  agent of a funeral service director, or a dispositioner --
Medical certification -- Records of funeral service director or dispositioner
-- Information filed with local registrar -- Unlawful signing of certificate
of death.
(1)  The custodial funeral service director or, if a funeral service director
is not retained, a dispositioner shall sign the certificate of death prior to
any disposition of a dead body or dead fetus.
(2)  The custodial funeral service director, an agent of the custodial funeral
service director, or, if a funeral service director is not retained, a
dispositioner shall:
(a)  obtain personal and statistical information regarding the decedent from
the available persons best qualified to provide the information;
(b)  present the certificate of death to the attending health care
professional, if any, or to the medical examiner who shall certify the cause
of death and other information required on the certificate of death;
(c)  provide the address of the custodial funeral service director or, if a
funeral service director is not retained, a dispositioner;
(d)  certify the date and place of burial; and
(e)  file the certificate of death with the state or local registrar.
(3)  A funeral service director, dispositioner, embalmer, or other person who
removes a dead body or dead fetus from the place of death or transports or is
in charge of final disposal of a dead body or dead fetus, shall keep a record
identifying the dead body or dead fetus, and containing information pertaining
to receipt, removal, and delivery of the dead body or dead fetus as prescribed
by department rule.
(4) (a)  Not later than the tenth day of each month, every licensed funeral
service establishment shall send to the local registrar and the department a
list of the information required in Subsection (3) for each casket furnished
and for funerals performed when no casket was furnished, during the preceding
month.
(b)  The list described in Subsection (4)(a) shall be in the form prescribed
by the state registrar.
(5)  Any person who intentionally signs the portion of a certificate of death
that is required to be signed by a funeral service director or a dispositioner
under Subsection (1) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor, unless the person:
(a) (i)  is a funeral service director; and
(ii)  is employed by a licensed funeral establishment; or
(b)  is a dispositioner, if a funeral service director is not retained.
(6)  The state registrar shall post information on the state registrar's
website, providing instructions to a dispositioner for complying with the
requirements of law relating to the dispositioner's responsibilities for:
(a)  completing and filing a certificate of death; and
(b)  possessing, transporting, and disposing of a dead body or dead fetus.
(7)  The provisions of this chapter shall be construed to avoid interference,
to the fullest extent possible, with the ceremonies, customs, rites, or
beliefs of the decedent and the decedent's next of kin for disposing of a dead
body or dead fetus.
